Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13B Administrative Hearings
13B.130.
Official record of hearing.

In each administrative hearing, an agency shall keep an official record of the proceedings which shall consist of:

All notices, pleadings, motions, and intermediate rulings;

Any prehearing orders;

Evidence received and considered;

A statement of matters officially noticed;

Proffers of proof and objections and rulings thereon;

Proposed findings, requested orders, and exemptions;

A copy of the recommended order, exceptions filed to the recommended order, and a copy of the final order;

All requests by the hearing officer for an extension of time, and the response of the agency head;

Ex parte communications placed upon the record by the hearing officer; and

A recording or transcript of the proceedings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 13, effective July 15, 1996.

13B.140.
Judicial review of final order.

Except as provided in KRS

452.005

, all final orders of an agency shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. A party shall institute an appeal by filing a petition in the Circuit Court of venue, as provided in the agency’s enabling statutes, within thirty (30) days after the final order of the agency is mailed or delivered by personal service. If venue for appeal is not stated in the enabling statutes, a party may appeal to Franklin Circuit Court or the Circuit Court of the county in which the appealing party resides or operates a place of business. Copies of the petition shall be served by the petitioner upon the agency and all parties of record. The petition shall include the names and addresses of all parties to the proceeding and the agency involved, and a statement of the grounds on which the review is requested. The petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the final order.

A party may file a petition for judicial review only after the party has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the agency whose action is being challenged, and within any other agency authorized to exercise administrative review.

Within twenty (20) days after the service of the petition, or within further time allowed by the court, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy of the official record of the proceeding under review. By stipulation of all parties to the review proceedings, the record may be shortened. The court may require or permit subsequent correction or additions to the official record. If the court requests a transcript of proceedings that have not been transcribed, the cost of the transcription shall be paid by the party initiating the appeal, unless otherwise agreed to by all parties.

A petition for judicial review shall not automatically stay a final order pending the outcome of the review, unless:

An automatic stay is provided by statute upon appeal or at any point in the administrative proceedings;

A stay is permitted by the agency and granted upon request; or

A stay is ordered by the Circuit Court of jurisdiction upon petition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; 2021 ch. 2, § 2, effective February 2, 2021.

13B.150.
Conduct of judicial review.

Except as provided in KRS

452.005

, review of a final order shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the record, unless there is fraud or misconduct involving a party engaged in administration of this chapter. The court, upon request, may hear oral argument and receive written briefs. Challenges to the constitutionality of a final order shall be reviewed in accordance with KRS

452.005

.

The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the agency as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm the final order or it may reverse the final order, in whole or in part, and remand the case for further proceedings if it finds the agency’s final order is:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;

Without support of substantial evidence on the whole record;

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion;

Based on an ex parte communication which substantially prejudiced the rights of any party and likely affected the outcome of the hearing;

Prejudiced by a failure of the person conducting a proceeding to be disqualified pursuant to KRS 13B.040(2); or

Deficient as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 2021 ch. 2, § 3, effective February 2, 2021.

13B.160.
Judicial appeal.

Any aggrieved party may appeal any final judgment of the Circuit Court under this chapter to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 16, effective July 15, 1996.

13B.170.
Administrative regulations.

An agency shall have authority to promulgate administrative regulations that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an agency from enacting administrative hearing procedures by administrative regulations which are supplemental to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 382, § 17, effective July 15, 1996.